Tennessee, session 114, SB0810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-143, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(d) Any public institution of higher education that receives funds from the
distribution of credit cards to students or any percentage from the use of cards bearing
the college or university name or logo shall report the amount of such funds or
percentage that it received as well as how the funds were expended during the previous
fiscal year to the education committee of the senate and the committee of the house of
representatives having jurisdiction in education by November 1 of each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0810
001071
- 1 -